Idaho statutes. Title 61 PUBLIC UTILITY REGULATION
Chapter 3 DUTIES OF PUBLIC UTILITIES
§ 61-332A. Definitions for electric supplier stabilization act.

As used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Public utility” means an electric utility regulated by the Idaho public utilities commission.

“Cooperative” means a cooperative corporation furnishing electric service in the state of Idaho to its consumer-members who own and operate the cooperative.

“Municipality” means any municipal corporation or quasi-municipal corporation furnishing electric service to the consumers of the municipality in the state of Idaho.

“Electric supplier” means any public utility, cooperative, or municipality supplying or intending to supply electric service to a consumer.

“Electric service” means electricity furnished to an ultimate consumer by an electric supplier.

“Consumer” is any person, firm, corporation, or other entity receiving or intending to receive electric service at a specific service entrance.

“Service entrance” means the location on the consumer’s property where the consumer’s main disconnect switch, fuses or other disconnect equipment exists, and which are intended to provide the means of cutoff of the supply.

“New service entrance” means a service entrance not previously served with electricity. A change, improvement, replacement, enlargement, or change in location of a service entrance shall not be deemed a “new service entrance” if utilized to serve any service or utilization equipment previously served with electricity from the former service entrance, but for the provisions of this act shall be deemed the former “service entrance.” A change in consumer shall not be construed to make an existing service entrance a “new service entrance.” A change, enlargement, or other modification of service or utilization equipment served from an existing service entrance shall not be construed to make it a “new service entrance.”

“Transmission line,” for the purposes of this act, means any electric line of an electric supplier carrying a voltage of sixty-nine (69) KV or more.

“Service line,” for the purposes of this act, means any single or multi-phase electric line of an electric supplier used for carrying less than sixty-nine (69) KV and used or capable of use to provide electric service for a consumer.

“Existing service line” means any electric service line in existence at the time of the event in question and constructed to supply a consumer that could be lawfully served by that electric supplier under this act. It shall not mean any service line constructed to obtain an advantage under this act, or to evade its purpose or terms.

“Commission” means the Idaho public utilities commission.

§ 61-332B. Electric supplier prohibited from serving consumers or former consumers of another electric supplier.

No electric supplier shall supply or furnish electric service to any electric service entrance that is then or had at any time previously been lawfully connected for electric service to facilities of another electric supplier except as provided in this act.

§ 61-332C. Provisions for selecting electric supplier for new electric service entrances.

In determining which electric supplier will provide electric service for a new service entrance, the following provisions will govern:

If no electric supplier has an existing service line within one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet of a new service entrance the consumer shall have the right of choice of electric supplier.

If only one (1) electric supplier has an existing service line within one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet of the new service entrance that electric supplier shall have the right to serve the consumer at the new service entrance.

If more than one (1) electric supplier has an existing service line within one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet of the new service entrance the electric supplier whose existing service line is nearest the new service entrance shall have the right to serve the consumer at the new service entrance.

If more than one (1) electric supplier has an existing service line within one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet of the new service entrance and it cannot be determined by proof which service line is nearest the new service entrance, then the consumer or an electric supplier shall petition the commission for an order determining which electric supplier is nearest the new service entrance.

For purposes of this act distances shall mean the exact distance measured using standard land surveying practices as established by the board of [licensure of] professional engineers and [professional] land surveyors of the state of Idaho.

No electric supplier shall construct or extend facilities, nor make any electric connections, nor permit any connection to be made from any of its facilities to any new service entrance nor shall it supply electric service to any new service entrance in violation of the provisions of this section, except as ordered by the commission pursuant to this act.

§ 61-332D. Wheeling services.

An electric supplier shall not be required to provide wheeling service over its system if such service results in retail wheeling and/or a sham wholesale transaction.

An electric supplier declining to furnish wheeling service pursuant to this section shall petition the commission for review of the electric supplier’s action in respect to a request for such service. The commission shall, upon notice and opportunity for hearing, review the electric supplier’s action for consistency with the purposes and provisions of this act, and issue an order in accordance with its finding, ordering either that the wheeling service shall, or shall not, be required.

§ 61-333. Authorizing contracts among electric suppliers to resolve territories, consumers and to transfer facilities.

Any electric supplier may contract in writing with any other electric supplier for the purpose of allocating territories, consumers, and future consumers between the electric suppliers and designating which territories and consumers are to be served by which contracting electric supplier. The territories and consumers so allocated and designated may include all or any portion of the territories and consumers which are being served by any or all of the contracting electric suppliers at the time the contract is entered into, or which could be economically served by the then existing facilities of any contracting electric supplier, or by reasonable and economic extensions thereto. All such contracts shall be filed with the commission. The commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, review and approve or reject contracts between cooperatives, between cooperatives and public utilities and between public utilities. The commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, review and approve or reject contracts between municipalities and cooperatives, as well as between municipalities and public utilities, provided however, the commission shall have jurisdiction only over cooperatives and public utilities in such approvals. The commission shall approve such contracts only upon finding that the allocation of territories or consumers is in conformance with the provisions and purposes of this act.

Any electric supplier may also contract in writing with any other electric supplier for the sale, exchange, transfer, or lease of equipment or facilities located within territory which is the subject of any allocation contracted for under subsection (1) of this section and any contract validly entered into and approved by the commission after notice and opportunity for hearing shall be binding and shall be legally enforceable pursuant to this act, or by any other remedy provided by law.

§ 61-333A. Increased area — Extension of service permitted.

In the event an area hereafter shall be included as a result of incorporation or annexation within the boundaries of a city, town or village, any public utility and any cooperative association organized for the purpose of furnishing electric service to its members or consumers only, furnishing electric service or operating electric facilities in such area prior to such inclusion, shall, unless the municipality acquire such facilities pursuant to section 61-333B, Idaho Code, and subject to the provisions of sections 61-332B and 61-332C, Idaho Code, have the right to continue and extend the furnishing of electric services in such area, and to utilize public streets, alleys and thoroughfares, or such portion of such annexed area as is designated on the recorded plat for the installation of utilities, for such purpose. Such public utility or cooperative association shall comply with all lawful and reasonable safety requirements and the laws of the state of Idaho and nondiscriminatory ordinances of the city, town or village, as to the manner of constructing and maintaining electrical facilities therein.

§ 61-333B. Municipal corporation restricted in serving new area previously served by utility or cooperative association — Voluntary agreements — Election — Appeals.

In the event the annexing municipality has been furnishing electric service to its residents at the time of such annexation, or thereafter commences the furnishing of such service to its residents, nothing in this chapter shall prevent such municipality from extending its service to the annexed or incorporated area, upon the payment of just compensation, as defined in section 7-711, Idaho Code, to such public utility or cooperative serving such area prior to annexation, for any property, real or personal, including damages to the remainder of the system, if any, of such cooperative or public utility, used in distribution, transmission or supply of electrical energy to such area prior to annexation. As used herein, just compensation shall include consideration of new installations necessarily made between the time of annexation or incorporation and final settlement.

Provided, however, in case the annexed area was previously served by a cooperative association, no extension shall be made by the municipal corporation, except upon the following conditions:

Until the terms and conditions of such extension, including just compensation therefor, have been finally determined by voluntary agreement between the annexing municipality and the servicing cooperative association, or

In the event that such voluntary agreement cannot be made within ninety (90) days of the date of incorporation or annexation of such territory served by such cooperative association, then the municipal corporation may, if so determined by unanimous vote of its governing body, submit to the qualified electors of such municipality upon a special ballot to be voted upon at the next regular election of such municipality, the question “Shall portions of the .... of ...., Idaho which have heretofore been served electrical energy by .... become a part of the electrical system of the .... of ...., Idaho. Said areas are generally known and described as follows: (Insert description).”

A majority of the votes cast on said special ballot must be in favor of the proposition in order to approve the transaction on the part of the municipal corporation. Further, the cooperative association shall submit either by mail or at an annual or special meeting to its members, at the same time of the municipal election above mentioned, the question of whether or not the board of such cooperative association be authorized to sell to the municipality upon payment of just compensation, to be agreed upon, or if agreement be not reached, upon compensation determined as provided hereinafter. A majority of the votes cast must be in favor of the proposition in order to approve the transaction on the part of the cooperative association. At least 15 days before the vote by the members of the cooperative association, the association shall submit to the municipality a list of members eligible to vote and the municipality is hereby authorized to submit to said members a written statement of the reasons for the transfer to electric service by the municipality.

If agreement cannot be reached upon the amount of just compensation, the matter shall be submitted to the district court of the county wherein the municipality is located pursuant to procedures of title 10, chapter 12, Idaho Code, for this purpose of fixing and determining the amount of just compensation as hereinbefore defined.
The court may appoint not more than two (2) experts to advise the court, and the costs of the action, including fees of such experts, shall be taxed equally to the parties.

Either party may appeal from the decision of the court in the same manner that other appeals are taken therefrom. No transfer of facilities shall be made until the amount of compensation has been finally determined and paid.

§ 61-333C. Nonmunicipal service organizations prohibited from extending service.

Nothing contained herein shall authorize any cooperative association or public utility having transmission lines presently within corporate limits of any municipal corporation, presently engaged in the sale of electrical energy to its citizens, to make any service connections within corporate limits of such municipal corporation from such transmission lines.

§ 61-334. Special rules of interpretation.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to:

Grant the commission jurisdiction over cooperatives or municipalities except as authorized in this act.

Apply to controversies between two (2) or more public utilities.

Preclude any electric supplier from extending electric service to its own property or facilities or to another electric supplier for resale, provided any line extension made under this clause shall not be considered in determining the right of electric suppliers to serve new service entrances under section 61-332C, Idaho Code.

Abrogate or limit the authority of any municipality under any other statute or law with respect to the municipality providing electricity to the municipality or the consumers of the municipality within the boundaries of the municipality.

§ 61-334A. Remedies for violation of this act.

Any electric supplier or consumer whose rights under this act shall be violated or threatened with violation may file a complaint with the commission against an electric supplier and any other person responsible for the violation.

After notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law determining whether this act or any orders issued under this act have been violated or threatened to be violated and shall determine whether there is actual or threatened irreparable injury as to the electric supplier or consumer whose rights are violated or threatened with violation as a basis for granting relief.

The relief to be granted under this section for violation of this act shall forbid further acts in violation of such orders, shall order the removal of any electric connections, facilities or equipment that constitute the violation, or a combination thereof necessary to enforce compliance with this act.

§ 61-334B. Commission supervision and authority.

Upon a petition by an electric supplier or consumer for an exception to the provisions of section 61-332B or 61-332C(1)(a), (b) or (c), Idaho Code, the commission shall issue an order granting such request only upon finding that granting the request is consistent with the purposes of this act as set forth in section 61-332, Idaho Code.

The commission shall have power to issue authorizations and orders requested under this act, or to refuse to issue the same, and may attach to any authorization and order as a condition of approval such terms and conditions as it determines are consistent with the purposes and provisions of this act.

In all matters arising under this act, which are submitted to the commission for decision, order or review, the procedure shall be governed by chapters 6 and 7, title 61, Idaho Code, and the commission’s rules of procedure. Reconsideration of, appeal from, enforcement of, and stay of orders issued pursuant to this act shall be governed by law as for other orders of the commission in other matters.

§ 61-334C. Electric supplier immunity.

No action under the Idaho competition act, chapter 1, title 48, Idaho Code, or any other provision or doctrine of law of the state of Idaho shall lie against an electric supplier for action or inaction that is in compliance with the provisions of this act or any commission order issued pursuant to this act.

§ 61-335. Approval of carrier agreements. [Repealed.]

§ 61-336. Additional authorities of electrical or natural gas corporations.

The commission may authorize any public utility that is an electrical or natural gas corporation to file and place into effect schedules establishing rates or charges for energy conservation measures, services or payments provided to individual property owners or customers. Application of the schedule shall be subject to agreement between the public utility and the property owner or customer receiving service at the time the conservation measures, services or payments are initially provided. The schedule may include provisions for the payment of the rates or charges over a period of time and for the application of the payment obligation to successive property owners or customers at the premises where the conservation measures or services were installed or performed or with respect to which the conservation payments were made. The public utility shall record a notice of the payment obligation with the county recorder in the county where the property is located. The commission may prescribe by rule other methods by which the public utility shall notify property owners or customers of any such payment obligation.

§ 61-337. Fish and wildlife mitigation information.

On and after July 1, 2004, each electric utility with one thousand (1,000) customers or more may provide information in its bills to its customers regarding the percentage of the electric utility’s costs of supplying electric energy to its customers which is utilized for fish and wildlife mitigation purposes on the electric utility’s system.

On and after July 1, 2004, each cooperative and municipality furnishing electric service, as those terms are defined in section 61-332A, Idaho Code, (excepting a cooperative that serves less than one thousand (1,000) customers and also serves consumers in other states) may provide information on its bills to its customers of the percentage cost of fish and wildlife mitigation included in the cost of electric energy sold to the cooperative or municipality’s customers.

Annually, at a time at the discretion of the utility or entity, a statement shall be posted on the utility’s or entity’s website detailing to whom and the amount spent on fish and wildlife mitigation by the utility or entity for the most recent fiscal year.

§ 61-338. Customer cost information. [Null and void.]

§ 61-339. Cooperative and municipal corporations furnishing electrical service

Customer cost information. [Null and void.]